test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tenevasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [теневавдавэхэдандо’, теневувдавэхэдандо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: [теневавдавэвнандо’, теневувдавэвнандо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [теневавдавэхэюдо’, теневувдавэхэюдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [теневавдавэхэюдо’, теневувдавэхэюдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [теневавдавэхэюто’, теневувдавэхэюто’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [теневавдавэйдо’, теневувдавэйдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: [теневавдавэйдо’, теневувдавэйдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: [теневавдавэйто’, теневувдавэйто’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [теневавдавэхэто’, теневувдавэхэто’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [теневавдавэхэ”нато’, теневувдавэхэ”нато’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [теневавдавэхэтато’, теневавдавэхэтто’, теневувдавэхэтато’, теневувдавэхэтто’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: [теневавдавэй”манато’, теневувдавэй”манато’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Abs: [теневавдавэд, теневувдавэд]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [теневавдавэдав, теневувдавэдав, теневавдавэдув, теневувдавэдув, теневавдавэдами, теневувдавэдами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [теневавдавэдав, теневувдавэдав, теневавдавэдув, теневувдавэдув, теневавдавэдами, теневувдавэдами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [теневавдавэдан, теневувдавэдан, теневавдавэдани, теневувдавэдани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: [теневавдавэдар, теневувдавэдар]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: [теневавдавэдамд, теневувдавэдамд]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: [теневавдавэданд, теневувдавэданд]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [теневавдавэдада, теневувдавэдада]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [теневавдавэдамда, теневувдавэдамда]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [теневавдавэданда, теневувдавэданда]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [теневавдавэдами’, теневувдавэдами’]
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [теневавдавэдами, теневувдавэдами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [теневавдавэдами’, теневувдавэдами’]
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [теневавдавэдами, теневувдавэдами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [теневавдавэдани’, теневувдавэдани’]
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [теневавдавэдани, теневувдавэдани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [теневавдавэдари’, теневувдавэдари’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [теневавдавэдамди’, теневувдавэдамди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [теневавдавэданди’, теневувдавэданди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [теневавдавэдади’, теневувдавэдади’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [теневавдавэдамди’, теневувдавэдамди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [теневавдавэданди’, теневувдавэданди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [теневавдавэдава”, теневувдавэдава”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [теневавдавэдава”, теневувдавэдава”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [теневавдавэдана”, теневувдавэдана”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [теневавдавэдара”, теневувдавэдара”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [теневавдавэдамда”, теневувдавэдамда”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [теневавдавэданда”, теневувдавэданда”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [теневавдавэдадо’, теневувдавэдадо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [теневавдавэдамдо’, теневувдавэдамдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [теневавдавэдандо’, теневувдавэдандо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg1: [теневавдавэдм’, теневувдавэдм’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg2: [теневавдавэн, теневувдавэн]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg3: [теневавдавэй, теневувдавэй]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu1: [теневавдавэни’, теневувдавэни’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu2: [теневавдавэди’, теневувдавэди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu3: [теневавдавэхэ’, теневувдавэхэ’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl1: [теневавдавэва”, теневувдавэва”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl2: [теневавдавэда”, теневувдавэда”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl3: [теневавдавэй”, теневувдавэй”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg1: [теневавдавэдамзь, теневувдавэдамзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg2: [теневавдавэнась, теневувдавэнась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg3: [теневавдавэясь, теневавдавэсь, теневувдавэясь, теневувдавэсь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu1: [теневавдавэнинзь, теневувдавэнинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu2: [теневавдавэдинзь, теневувдавэдинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu3: [теневавдавэхэнзь, теневувдавэхэнзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl1: [теневавдавэваць, теневувдавэваць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl2: [теневавдавэдаць, теневувдавэдаць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl3: [теневавдавэяць, теневавдавэць, теневувдавэяць, теневувдавэць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg1: [теневавдавэв, теневувдавэв]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg2: [теневавдавэр, теневувдавэр]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg3: [теневавдавэда, теневувдавэда]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu1: [теневавдавэми’, теневувдавэми’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu2: [теневавдавэри’, теневувдавэри’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu3: [теневавдавэди’, теневувдавэди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl1: [теневавдавэва”, теневувдавэва”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl2: [теневавдавэра”, теневувдавэра”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl3: [теневавдавэдо’, теневувдавэдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg1: [теневавдавэвась, теневувдавэвась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg2: [теневавдавэрась, теневувдавэрась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg3: [теневавдавэдась, теневувдавэдась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu1: [теневавдавэминзь, теневувдавэминзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu2: [теневавдавэринзь, теневувдавэринзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu3: [теневавдавэдинзь, теневувдавэдинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl1: [теневавдавэваць, теневувдавэваць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl2: [теневавдавэраць, теневувдавэраць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl3: [теневавдавэдонзь, теневувдавэдонзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg1: [теневавдавэхэюн, теневувдавэхэюн]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg2: [теневавдавэхэюд, теневувдавэхэюд]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg3: [теневавдавэхэюда, теневувдавэхэюда]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu1: [теневавдавэхэюни’, теневувдавэхэюни’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu2: [теневавдавэхэюди’, теневувдавэхэюди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu3: [теневавдавэхэюди’, теневувдавэхэюди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl1: [теневавдавэхэюна”, теневувдавэхэюна”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl2: [теневавдавэхэюда”, теневувдавэхэюда”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl3: [теневавдавэхэюдо’, теневувдавэхэюдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg1: [теневавдавэхэюнась, теневувдавэхэюнась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg2: [теневавдавэхэюдась, теневувдавэхэюдась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg3: [теневавдавэхэюдась, теневувдавэхэюдась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu1: [теневавдавэхэюнинзь, теневувдавэхэюнинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu2: [теневавдавэхэюдинзь, теневувдавэхэюдинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu3: [теневавдавэхэюдинзь, теневувдавэхэюдинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl1: [теневавдавэхэюнаць, теневувдавэхэюнаць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl2: [теневавдавэхэюдаць, теневувдавэхэюдаць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl3: [теневавдавэхэюдонзь, теневувдавэхэюдонзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg1: [теневавдавэян, теневувдавэян]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg2: [теневавдавэяд, теневувдавэяд]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg3: [теневавдавэйда, теневувдавэйда]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu1: [теневавдавэйни’, теневувдавэйни’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu2: [теневавдавэйди’, теневувдавэйди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu3: [теневавдавэйди’, теневувдавэйди’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl1: [теневавдавэйна”, теневувдавэйна”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl2: [теневавдавэйда”, теневувдавэйда”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl3: [теневавдавэйдо’, теневувдавэйдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg1: [теневавдавэйнась, теневувдавэйнась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg2: [теневавдавэйдась, теневувдавэйдась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg3: [теневавдавэйдась, теневувдавэйдась]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu1: [теневавдавэйнинзь, теневувдавэйнинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu2: [теневавдавэйдинзь, теневувдавэйдинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu3: [теневавдавэйдинзь, теневувдавэйдинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl1: [теневавдавэйнаць, теневувдавэйнаць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl2: [теневавдавэйдаць, теневувдавэйдаць]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl3: [теневавдавэйдонзь, теневувдавэйдонзь]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Tra: [теневавдавэӈэ, теневувдавэӈэ]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Car: [теневавдавэси”, теневувдавэси”]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Equ: [теневавдавэдарем’, теневувдавэдарем’]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Equ+Lat: [теневавдавэдарев’, теневувдавэдарев’]
     теневась+V+TV+ConNeg: тенев”
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+ConNeg: теневаӈгу”
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+ConNeg: [теневасьту”, теневасету”]
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+Abs: теневаб”
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg1: [теневаба”н, теневаб”ни]
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg2: теневабат
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg3: теневабта
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu1: теневаб”ни’
#     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg1.2: теневаб”ни
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu2: теневабти’
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu3: теневабти’
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl1: теневаб”на”
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl2: теневабта”
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl3: теневабто’
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg1: [теневаб”нан, теневаб”нани]
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg2: теневаб”нанд
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg3: теневаб”нанда
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxDu1: теневаб”нани’
#     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg1.2: теневаб”нани
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxDu2: теневаб”нанди’
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxDu3: теневаб”нанди’
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl1: теневаб”нана”
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl2: теневаб”нанда”
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl3: теневаб”нандо’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮ1+Abs: [теневаӈгоб”, теневаӈгодаб”]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg1: [теневаӈгоба”н, теневаӈгодаба”н, теневаӈгоб”ни, теневаӈгоба”ни, теневаӈгодаб”ни]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg2: [теневаӈгобат, теневаӈгодабат]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg3: [теневаӈгобта, теневаӈгобата, теневаӈгодабта]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu1: [теневаӈгоб”ни’, теневаӈгоба”ни’, теневаӈгодаб”ни’]
#     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg1.2: [теневаӈгоб”ни, теневаӈгоба”ни, теневаӈгодаб”ни]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu2: [теневаӈгобти’, теневаӈгобати’, теневаӈгодабти’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu3: [теневаӈгобти’, теневаӈгобати’, теневаӈгодабти’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl1: [теневаӈгоб”на”, теневаӈгоба”на”, теневаӈгодаб”на”]
